District of Columbia statutes.
31-4713

Repealed

Prohibited activities — Securities operations.

Repealed.

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1173, ch. 672, ch. V, § 13
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(j), 44 DCR 1730
Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-265, § 126(a), 48 DCR 1225
redesignated § 301, Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, § 20(b), 49 DCR 8140
1981 Ed., § 35-518.
1973 Ed., § 35-713.